Massachusetts, session 194th, S2187.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 29 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by adding the following section:-  
Section 72.  
As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context clearly requires 
otherwise, have the following meanings:  
“Intentionally-added PFAS”, PFAS chemicals that are added to a product or that enter the 
product from the manufacturing or processing of the product; provided, however, that the 
manufacturer of the product knows, or is reasonably expected to know, or possesses or controls 

of 3 9 information of the addition of PFAS chemicals; and provided further, that “intentionally-added 
PFAS” shall include any degradation products containing PFAS chemicals or products for which 
PFAS chemicals or PFAS precursors are used as a processing agent or mold release agent or 
PFAS created by chemical reactions.  
“Perfluoraolkyl and polyfluoraolkyl substances” or “PFAS chemicals”, a class of 
fluorinated organic chemicals containing at least 1 fully fluorinated carbon atom.  
No state agency or state authority shall provide funding for the purchase, use or 
installation of artificial turf that contains zinc, plastic, or intentionally-added perfluoroalkyl and 
polyfluoroalkyl substances for any new or existing field. Any existing artificial turf field 
containing zinc, plastic, or intentionally-added PFAS chemicals shall be allowed to be used for 
its useful life but shall not be replaced with artificial turf containing zinc, plastic, or 
intentionally-added PFAS chemicals.  
SECTION 2. Chapter 40 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
adding the following section:-  
Section 70.  
“Intentionally-added PFAS”, PFAS chemicals that are added to a product or that enter the 
product from the manufacturing or processing of the product; provided, however, that the 
manufacturer of the product knows, or is reasonably expected to know, or possesses or controls 
information of the addition of PFAS chemicals; and provided further, that “intentionally-added 
PFAS” shall include any degradation products containing PFAS chemicals or products for which 
PFAS chemicals or PFAS precursors are used as a processing agent or mold release agent or 
PFAS created by chemical reactions.  

of 3 31  “Local government”, a county, city, town or other municipal entity.  
“Perfluoraolkyl and polyfluoraolkyl substances” or “PFAS chemicals”, a class of 
fluorinated organic chemicals containing at least 1 fully fluorinated carbon atom.  
No local government shall provide funding for the purchase, use or installation of 
artificial turf that contains zinc, plastic, or intentionally-added perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl 
substances for any new or existing field. Any existing artificial turf field containing zinc, plastic, 
or intentionally-added PFAS chemicals shall be allowed to be used for its useful life but shall not 
be replaced with artificial turf containing zinc, plastic, or intentionally-added PFAS chemicals.